Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.74.010

General law applicable.

Code cities may exercise authority granted by general law and available to any class of city for the relief of the poor and destitute, including, but not limited to the provisions of *RCW 74.04.390 through 74.04.470.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.74.010.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 74.04.390 through 74.04.470 were repealed by 1991 c 126 s 11.